Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4200.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 453 of Title 43A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services
shall develop a public-private partnership called the "Forensic
Assertive Community Treatment Program". The purpose of the program
HB4200 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

is t o provide an investment in the development and implementation of
forensic assertive community treatment teams across the state with
the goal of preventing and addressing homelessness and decreasing
recidivism for those with serious mental illness who are criminal
justice involved.
B. The Forensic Assertive Community Treatment Program shall
address, but not be limited to, the following:
1. Creation of a Tulsa County, an Oklahoma County, and a rural
forensic assertive community treatment team with the creation of
additional teams to be determined by community need if sufficient
funding exists;
2. Identification of the population in most need of intense
community-based psychiatric services that improve immediate need and
improve stabilization;
3. Development or adoption of a tool to measure the fidelity of
the forensic assertive community treatment teams; and
4. Development of partnerships within local communities to
assist in the provision of the Forensic Community Assertive
Treatment Program.
C. 1. The Forensic Assertive Community Treatment Program shall
be administered by the Department of Mental Health and Substance
Abuse Services. The Department shall be authorized to enter into
public-private partnerships to assist in the funding, oversight, and
evaluation of forensic assertive community treatment.
HB4200 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

2. Funding for the creation of each forensic assertive
community treatment team shall be subject to the commitment of
twenty-five percent (25%) matching funding from a private source up
to One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) from the Department of Mental
Health and Substance Abuse Services for each team.
D. The Department shall promulgate rules as necessary to
administer the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 454 of Title 43A, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury, a revolving fund
for the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services to
be designated the "Forensic Assertive Community Treatment Program
Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject
to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received
by the Oklahoma Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse
Services from state-appropriated funds, federal funds, donations,
grants, and contributions from any public or private source and
designated for the purpose set forth in Section 1 of this act. All
monies accruing to the credit of said fund are hereby appropriated
and may be budgeted and expended by the Department of Mental Health
and Substance Abuse Services for the purposes provided in Section 1
of this act. Expenditures from said fund shall be made upon
warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
HB4200 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

pres cribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
OVERSIGHT, dated 03/05/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.















HB4200 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.